Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 2
ADMINISTRATIVE DISSOLUTION

7-114-201. Grounds for administrative dissolution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 828, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1325, § 39, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(b) amended, p. 980, § 65, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), and (1)(d) amended, p. 2328, § 267, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1508, § 283, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 1218, § 26, effective October 1.

7-114-202. Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 828, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 75, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2), (3), (4), and (5) amended, p. 2329, § 268, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 1218, § 26, effective October 1.

7-114-203. Reinstatement following administrative dissolution - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 829, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:

(3) amended, p. 75, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1)(e) amended, p. 1326, § 40, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) and (1)(c) amended, p. 980, § 66, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1850, § 123, effective July 1; IP(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1715, § 123, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(5) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-114-204. Appeal from denial of reinstatement - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article added, p. 830, § 1, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 76, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1326, § 41, effective June 1.

L. 2003:

(5) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)